Missouri, session 2026, SB1123.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 573.550, RSMo, is repealed and two new
sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections
67.5127 and 573.550, to read as follows:
67.5127. Any library district or school district that
employs a person who has been found guilty of the offense of
providing explicit sexual material to a student as defined
in section 573.550 shall no longer be eligible to receive
any funds raised by the state.
573.550. 1. A person commits the offense of providing
explicit sexual material to a student if such person is
affiliated with a public or private elementary or secondary
school in an official capacity and, knowing of its content
and character, such person provides, assigns, supplies,
distributes, loans, approves, or coerces acceptance of or
the approval of the providing of explicit sexual material to
a student or possesses with the purpose of providing,
assigning, supplying, distributing, loaning, approving, or
coercing acceptance of or the approval of the providing of
explicit sexual material to a student.

SB 1123 2
2. The offense of providing explicit sexual material
to a student is a class A misdemeanor.
3. As used in this section, the following terms shall
mean:
(1) "Explicit sexual material", any pictorial, three-
dimensional, or visual depiction, including any photography,
film, video, picture, or computer-generated image, showing
human masturbation, deviate sexual intercourse as defined in
section 566.010, sexual intercourse, direct physical
stimulation of genitals, sadomasochistic abuse, or
emphasizing the depiction of postpubertal human genitals;
provided, however, that works of art, when taken as a whole,
that have serious artistic significance, or works of
anthropological significance, or materials used in science
courses, including but not limited to materials used in
biology, anatomy, physiology, and sexual education classes
shall not be deemed to be within the foregoing definition;
(2) "Person affiliated with a public or private
elementary or secondary school in an official capacity", an
administrator, teacher, librarian, media center personnel,
substitute teacher, teacher's assistant, student teacher,
law enforcement officer, school board member, library board
member, school bus driver, guidance counselor, coach, guest
lecturer, guest speaker, or other nonschool employee who is
invited to present information to students by a teacher,
administrator, or other school employee. Such term shall
not include a student enrolled in the elementary or
secondary school.
✓